Land of Bethlehem: Light and Sky


by Lucifer














It should be common sense early that the men who are mothers are bullying and smothering children, and a loving father is not so, and the mothers, they are not what men do, they are not a man, but there is another thing, not a mother, but a wise man who is an excellent father, and this is not a mother, and neither is any loving father. Now it is common sense, is it not, among Israel, and is it not common sense also among Bethlehem? Now if you are loving all that is good, to love wisdom, that you achieve the common sense of Bethlehem, to not be descending to the valley, to be lower people of valleys, then common sense is with you, and you will know the three types of women: the Anne Frank, who goes and asks, who goes and says in truth what is wrong, the Danielle, who will not say it, but take out frustration that the man of understanding will say, what is wrong? The Bethlehem daughter, who makes peace with herself, for is she not with child? Now then all these daughters, are they not all required? But indeed there is a season for all of them, the three, and they are the three moons, and Bethlehem, it is also a plain of common sense, that is has the greater common sense in comparison to Egypt, which is a deep valley of valleys, and it has more common sense than Israel, which has common sense, and it is a little higher than Solomon's plain, although what does that matter, for Solomon and Nephtali, that is at the Solomon plain, they must be the people they are, and these people are as if snobs for integrity, and yet not snobs of foolishness. Now then there is the fulfillment that women are making in their journey from lesser things to more wisdom, and the purging of Egypt, it is required at this time, because too many have gone into the valley where people are less beautiful. Now beauty is first inside, and then radiating outside. Now trust in the Lord knows that integrity is able, for it is as combat, and what cannot be over-come with integrity, it is a brutal and violent thing. Now then if you will attain the seven eyes of the stone, indeed, only be avoiding Edom, for to the pentocostal who has problems of Edom, yet this is the illness, and so then purge Edom only, and will you not be able to handle all wisdom? Now by obedience to the Lord and faithfulness in this, will you not abstain from eating and drinking what is not good, that the poison will not be with you, and Edom will be gone? Now this is in an ideal circumstance, and the devil is able to poison with his servants. Now if you are understanding enough, then your strategy will become sound, and you will know the folly of sin, of all wickedness, that the Lord is God and has created the Universe, that it is His Universe He has created it. Now by giving you will receive, and yet if you give to those you should not give to, are you not shifting slabs of rock that cause disruption for the Earth? Now then not for no reason has the Christ said, be giving in secret, for the giving that cannot be in secret, in respect of God, with wisdom, may be as the shifting of large slabs of rock that causes disruption for the kingdoms of the Lord.
	Now take herbs in giving? Now receive peace? Now are you ever to be rewarded for troubling the kingdoms of the Lord? But be seeking wisdom that you may do things with respect of God, that this doing things with respect of God, it moves mountains. Now doing things with respect of God, it is the Law of Moses, that it is the eating of herbs, of green herbs that are acceptable. Now the Law of Moses of Zion, of Sion and Zion, of Bethlehem, it is the fulfillment of the Law of Moses. Now who is the teacher of the Law of Moses? But it is the Christ, that he teaches the Law of Moses, for the Christ was teacher of the Law of Moses. Now then to eat herbs is acceptable, that you give in secret, that you do things secretly when it is right, in the respect of God. Now by the teachings of Moses, there is purity, for you will not drink and eat poison by these things, and the poison will be purged from you. Now what was lost will be re-gained, and in the land of butter and honey, that is lifted up, common sense will be greater than Israel. Now then of religion, Love the Lord your God with all your heart mind and soul. Now do not love yourself in religion, for by the vain practise of religion, self-love, you will achieve Sion and Zion with Lucifer, rather than the High Priest sitting in the Temple there. Now this is as the small birds that float about throughout Sion and Zion, that were secular, and they caused the pure light to become grainy stone, rather than smooth and pure stone. Now by the teachings of the Christ, who was a teacher of the Law of Moses, will it not be then understood that the Hebrew Jews were already, many of them, obeying the Law of Moses in the way that was intended by Moses? For they obey, the more secular Jews, in the manner of Christian Judaism, and will they not say, we killed Him, and we killed prophets, and we did not want something before but now we do? Now all nations have done very bad things, and did not the Christ have to die in order to fulfill? But the time was a bad time for Israel, for the Pharisees were not obeying the Law of Moses as it was intended, and these primarily killed the Christ. Now what was lost will be re-gained, for it is as if ten of twelve of the understanding was departed from Israel, and did it not happen before the coming of the Christ? But Israel does not have religion, but it has the love of the Lord their God, with all their heart, mind, and soul, that Israel does not have religion, and especially not in the fashion of self-love, as loving oneself in religion, for if the first thing is not had, then what is there? Now it is the first step and no step can be missed, for it is the fundamental steps for the man, that the ten commandments are the fundamental steps. Now who can go up to Bethlehem if they do not take the ten steps and miss none, for when one step is missed, they stumble and fall, and a far distance they fall, and it is only the fundamental steps that are to be achieved. Now the small birds, the flocks, they are the self-love that dims the brilliance of the light, and pure light goes dim, and the large birds, yet the High-Priest does not have rule of this type over his domain, for he does not have his own angels, his own bishops, who go out and are as governors. But these dim the light so that it is always evening, and it is not really Sion and Zion anymore when this occurs. Now Sion and Zion, it is raised up to be among the clouds, and it is the Catholics who go through the valley of reverence to the Lord with candles. Now there is no contradiction, for the small birds are secular, and they make secular, to be self-love rather than the love of God, and yet the large birds are Catholic, and Sion and Zion is not Catholic, but it has Catholics within it. Now here I struggled and the Lord has aided me as my teacher. Now indeed they were both secular, as I have written, for I knew that they were not Sion and Zion, and I was not intending to attain Catholicism, and so to write that the large birds are Catholic is only so if Catholicism is attempted, otherwise, they are indeed secular, for they are not part of Sion and Zion. Now a thing must be completed before it is one thing or the other. Now what is the giving in secret? But it is not coveting another Shepherd's flocks, with concerns to Shepherds and it is also not committing adultery, for Bethlehem is to be attained, and also Israel must be attained. Now then men, be loving God, and be not trespassing, but be of integrity.

Now the zefar call it sorcery, and they are a people of fire, of holy fire and truth, and they are part of the society of the pheonix, for they are not Israel, the zefar and have different ways. Now they are found by Saturn, and the Lord is their God, the God of Abraham and Isaac, for He is the Lord of Saturn. Now they are people of fire and truth, for they are a refiner's fire and fuller's lye, and I passed over the Hebrew Jews and saw that some had a heavy cloak, and they were not burned and eroded by the zefar and yet when I considered again, I realized, the heavy cloak will not last, for it will only delay it, and the heavy cloak, even if they put their foot down, to keep the cloak on them, it will be devoured and eroded, the cloack and then they will be eroded and they will be left as a skeleton, and I realized I should not have said, some of you may marry the daughters of the zefar but I should have written, yet I passed over quickly, and believed you were safe, and yet though I believed some of you were safe, yet you are not, and yet if any has a cloak that they will keep on them, and it is not devoured ever by the fire of the zefar then I do not know all things, for the truth is too big for me, and if these are then safe, and they love a zefar and the zefar is loving them, then I am not coming to forbid love, or say that people should not be married, only that the Lord has done what he has done. Now the angel is Saruman to the zefar and also the angel, and he is Lucifer, and the angel is a staff of the Lord, and the Lord wields the staff, and to the Japanese people, he is a river, and the Lord has placed his boundaries upon the river, that it is the Lord.

Now to Nephtali, the plains of Solomon, nation as a place of water, what domain does the Lord give to you? But you rise to the clouds, even rising to Bethlehem, and you disperse rain upon the lands, even upon your own people, so that if any should hinder your domain, it is an attack upon the Lord. Now any who hinders the domain of any who is good, it is an attack upon the Lord, for all things must continue to do what is theirs to do. Now then Sion and Zion is among the clouds, the cloud plain, and will they not say, let us ascend the mountain, what is the majority of the land, and we will dwell in Bethlehem, the cloud plain? Now upon this place of the clouds what does it matter if one is a little higher or a little lower, but all are up among the cities of the clouds, and all are part of Sion and Zion, and the atheists are able to be on the cloud plain, and yet the children of men, though acceptable on another level, they are considered, by the words of some, to be too immature to be on the cloud plain. Now though they are not evil, for as yet they have not seen to be evil, yet on the cloud plain they would be evil and unacceptable, even as an abomination, and yet when they are upon their plain, that is lower, a lower plain on the journey of the mountain, there they are acceptable, and are they not harmless here, for it is their plain. Now better are the children of men, than those who dwell in the valleys, in the low valleys of the continent. Now what is the domain of the children of men? But they are slopes of dark Earth, and shadows, and the wings of terradactos, and they are as an innocent Kush, that Kush that was lifted up, and are they not better than Egypt? But upon their plain of Kush that is higher, they are much better than Egypt. Now they dwell with volcanoes, with fossils, with lava, and the sky is darkened with clouds and there is light, and they dwell among the paintings of caves, and they are delightful in their own land, the children of men. Now what is this higher plain that is in Kush, though Cush itself is lower than Egypt? But it is a higher plain of Cush, a higher place, and upon this plain are the children of men.

Now then the Jews who were Hebrew, they went away and said, we will not obey, and yet they returned and still saying, we will not, they obeyed, and many of them were more secular Jews, and they obeyed the Law of Moses in the fashion of Christianity, for there is the obedience of the Law of Moses in the fashion that was first, and the fashion of Christianity was already with it, and the Christ came teaching the Law of Moses, the ten commandments, which are the ten steps of Bethlehem for men, that these are the fundamental steps, that Bethlehem cannot be achieved if one of these steps is missing, for those who miss the steps, they trouble the kingdom, and they stumble and fall. Now then, casting away the lesser enlightenment that is having the fog of Egypt that is blinding, for it comes as a cloud that obscures vision, do not Shepherd another's flock, but be seeing with your eyes, and be respecting the flock of another Shepherd, and those not a Shepherd, be not Shepherding, that is foolish meddling of folly, for in what defence you must perform, so you perform. Now it is as, do not covet your neighbour's oxen. Now Love the Lord with all your heart, for do not turn into religion, the self-loving type that is pointless. But you do not have religion, but you have the love of the Lord, who is God. Now to miss this step is to even miss Israel, and what is it then? Now Lucifer was tempted for a breif moment by the devil, and yet it was not as Temptation, for it was a thing of foolishness, easily understood, and it was like saying, throw yourselves to the mud in the valley from Heaven, and the angel said, it will only be a lesson for me, in gaining wisdom, and not a temptation, for my heart is much for, with praise, the High-Priest to sit in Sion and Zion, for the temptation is not temptation, and it has been a void temptation, like the nagging of a fool to do something foolish, that is not wanted by the person it is told to. So I will use it for good, and say, yet the self-love, that does not love the Lord, it is like Lucifer sitting in Sion and Zion, for Sion and Zion is like the Earth, in size, and Jerusalem, like the moon, and yet Lucifer is praising the idea of the sun being in Sion and Zion, and the temptation was not even temptation, but more of a lesson, by which to give wisdom to the Hebrew Jews. 

Now the children of men are also atheists, and yet atheists are not the children of men. Now Saruman says, they are delightful in their own land, and their plain is lifted up and they are better than Egypt. Now there is the great expanse and Egypt is between them and the Nile, and the atheists, they are passing over to the children of men, and yet the angel tells them, become not them who you visit, for you are atheists, and not the children, but you are men, and they are the children, that you merely given advice by the angel, so that you are having the wisdom of it, that the children of men, you may not wish to become. Now will not those with wisdom say, atheists, no person has wanted you to give up your ways, for Babylon disgusts us, and it prays to the Lord, and has no integrity, for though it is seeming metal, yet it is a city made of sand. Now wisdom speaks it, indeed, those who understand, who have excellent understanding. 

Now then the Jews were soon obeying the Lord, according to Christianity, and all the while saying, I will not obey, and all the while obeying, and so it was with those who had been gentiles, that they had said, I will not obey, and the Lord said to his children, for He created all people on Earth, you are now a child of God as well, and His only son is gathering you to bring you to the Lord, that those who had said, we will not obey, they were then being another child of God. Now then His children were over all the Earth, and in various types, and many of the nations were with the angels and the others with the Lord's inheritence, and His people, and all were men and women, humans. Now then, is the angel going in with flight, with light between places, searching out the borders with light? For there is still much he does not know. Now the angel is not a Jew, neither a Zion Jew, a Sion Jew, or a Hebrew Jew, who have the Christ's Jews and the Jews of Moses, for some obey in the fashion of Moses, and some obey the Law of Moses in the fashion of the Christ, and both are acceptable, are they not? Now those who obey in the fashion of Moses, they stand at the Christ's right side, for they are not as those who ascend the steps to the Christ, and those who obey in the fashion of Elijah, miracles within Judaism and not with the Christ, they stand at the Christ's other side, whether they stand at the left or right, for I do not know which sides they stand on, or if it matters. Now these are not like the Jews who are called secular, and yet each is doing what pleases them, and it pleases some that they are standing at the Christ's side. Now you will not be insulting these who stand at his left and right side, by saying, the Christ is over you, but they stand with the Christ, for indeed the Christ is not over them, and they cannot help but be offended, and it is not a matter of treason or disloyalty to God, or any type of thing the devil might attempt. Now then are you not cautioned to understand what I have written rather than bullying each other with being overly technical when the correct understanding is opening the door for any type of accusations that divide the kingdoms of God, and cause war and lack of peace. For one thing falls in Mala, the discord happens, and the wave goes out and then there is physical war and violence, and early was the broken steps of the bridge that caused the wave that eventually lead to war. Now will you not all be pleased, and be positive with concerns to the fruition of God's kingdoms? Now then will I not at times place pretty men before me, as my representatives and defence, and the doves also, for I do not desire a kingdom of war. Now then is not Sion and Zion beautiful, and yet the ugliness of contentions that are ugly, let them rather contend with the devil, for he has enough ugly war for you, and it is a war worth winning, for you have already won.

Now why will any be surprised if they some people are able to better handle some things than a kami for they have their domain, each person, and their wisdom in these places, that by fulfilling in these places, doing well, being great in these things, it makes the land right for all. Now the cloud of Egypt, the blindness, has made it so that there is something guilt when a person should feel good, and yet I considered, it is not necessary, because when Sion and Zion and Jerusalem is fulfilled, and there is Bethlehem, then there will be none of this blinding cloud, this spirit, among the people, for it will have disappeared on its own, for Israel first will have been attained. Now then the ten commandments are the steps of men concerning God, and they are the steps taken to the men, for the woman, that the woman have their fundamental steps, and the ten commandments for them, that are their to have, according to the obedience to God, in the manner in which they please God. Now then the men are having the ten steps to Bethlehem, and each of these steps must be held, for if the steps are not had, then there is no Bethlehem, for by coveting the flock of another, there is the shifting of rocks under the Earth and the foundation of Bethlehem is threatened for all. Therefore, will God not care that you trouble the kingdom's of the Lord? But where there is not actually a right Shepherd of them, and yet they claim it is so, then you are remembering the respect of the Lord, the taking of herbs. Now then if by the respect of the Lord you discover that you meddle, indeed you are able to have peace. 
	Now then the Hebrew Jews, they do not say, the Christ is my father, over me, but they say, the Christ is His son, and we like him, and the Lord is our father, who is God. Now the orthodox Jews, they stand at the right and left of the Christ, and the Christ is not over them, and the Lord is their God. Now the angel has no problem with being the son of the Christ, if it should ever be wondered about, and neither would Daniel have any problem. But the Hebrew Jews, they are the Lord's inheritance again, if they are willing and obeying to bring about their reward, that they rejoice in, some of them, if not all, and Sion and Zion, the Lord's people. Now do not be afraid of the zefar who are not philistines unless they fall away and turn to Belzeebub, for they must be careful in their journey to choose correctly, to keep with integrity, for they are able to become philistines, and the philistines were zefar who had betrayed the Lord and gone to the devil, and some of them were the devil's witches, and Beelzebub inhabited them, and yet they are zefar and they will win, if they are keeping with the Lord, for the zefar will win over the witches of Beelzebub, and they are even what they call sorcerers, and you refer to miracles, and they call many things differently, for they are zefar and their ways are different, and yet they are the Lord's people as well, for the one ring, it has unbinded, segregated and sought to then bring together for Bethlehem, and the wise prophet, he did well in the way he choose, if the Lord guided him such, or he choose such, and these are things of the zefar, the things of Tolkein and such things, and you may notice these things are not things of Jews, for there are different people, and the ring has segregated them. Now if the Jews are not liking the things of the zefar and the zefar liking things of the Jews as well as their own things, yet it is only natural for different people groups, and different groups have their own ways. Now then zefar, society of the phoenix, gathered by Saturn, upon the outskirts and round about Jerusalem you are, the nation of Jerusalem, and the cities of the philistines are again serving the Lord, as they were always intended to, if they had not turned to the devil. Now then David is recognizing the requirement with concerns to the devil-witches for he dwells upon the plains of Tel Eton, and yet the people, Solomon, are they able to recognize? Now David is able to do war with a wizard of the Lord's, and he is having the wisdom and ability, for he does not kill Saturn's people if he kills them who have betrayed the Lord, who have gone to Beelzebub, for they betray all the kingdoms of the Lord. 
	Now then the zefar or elun are the people of Saturn, and in what way they approach God, whether it is through Saturn, as an angelic-god, or kami lord to be acknowledging this as well as God, is dependant on them and their journey towards discovering in what way they worship and come to God. Now all people must do this, and are able to do this, so that the angel writes, you will probably have to do this many times, and if you are determined to have the Lord, what you arrive upon, will it not be right? Now what people can say to you, be bowing to something, and yet you bow to another thing in your approaching God, for if God is still your God, then you will know what is right and another person cannot say. Now then go then and learn this proverb, but I will have mercy and not sacrifice, for if you know it will you accuse me in this thing? But the Lord has made all His people, and all are His, and only the polytheists are found in great error, to be having the devil as their lord, and yet Buddhism is not polytheism, for it desires to search out the Heavens, does it not? Now then, you who are the Lord's inheritance, the chosen children of him, and Sion and Zion, the chosen people of Him, are you then to wish you were something else? But some have been called to be a different thing than what they began, and yet a person cannot be apostate of Islam, that they leave this thing. Now what is any Muslim surprised by? But they are being the guards upon Earth, while there are angels upon Earth, concerning the angels. Now the Japanese people, of an angel's house, and their own house, and not to another kami lord do they bow. Now then, Hebrew Jews, for you did not know all before, and so be not considered insolent to the Muslims, for they are higher than you concerning angels, and there are angels upon Earth, and be not considered insolent to Muslims, regarding some things that are right or wrong, for they are a people able to understand some things that you do not. Now why do you curse, and bully them who are part of the Lord's kingdoms, even in ways, part of Heaven, that comes down to Earth, you who are His son, who are the Lord's inheritance? But much was not explained to you, and many people have committed much error. Now Elijah you know, and of the banished witches you know, and yet of the Lord's zefar you do not know, and are they not to be increasing in their ability with the Lord, for they must be able to defend themselves and to defend Jerusalem, for Beelzebub is indeed upon Earth, and who would be a terrorist anymore against the angel unless they were a devil worshipper, and who would be opposed to Sion and Zion, unless they did not read all concerning it? Now then the fourth day has come, and you are to be the Lord's inheritance again, and God did not abandon you. Now the High-Priest is in Sion and Zion, on his throne, and the angel is in his Temple in Bethlehem, and the moon has the moon, and the Earth, the sun. Now as it is in Heaven, then it should be on Earth, and this your ancient ancestors had known. Now the angel is not David's kingdom, or Solomon's kingdom, and these were both holy times, but the angel is the third Heaven, Bethlehem, and Solomon banished the priest of Anothoth to  his own fields, for Solomon's kingdom was not the angel's kingdom. Now Saturn had not come down to Earth at that time.
	Now then if the angel should dwell on Earth and the Hebrew Jews do not only say, great teacher, but they also believe, they are right to be always banishing such things to their own fields, that which is wrong for them, for they are given what is clean for them, that they not consider that which would not be in their fields, and what is not clean for them, while understanding that such things may belong in other parts of Israel, and yet not in their city, as it might be expressed, that they not incur the wrath of the priest of Anothoth, either by abandoning their plain, lowering themselves to understand, and speaking to that which is on a lower plain, for there is a law of the higher levels, that it is sometimes wrong to be speaking from one plain towards another, and it is not a thing of the Hebrew Jews, but a thing of the plains of the mountain. Now will not the Priest of Anothoth be in great wrath, and he is intolerant towards such things, for this wisdom is belonging to another kingdom, and the priest of Anothoth, he is also part of Saturn in a way, so that if there are those who are understanding those at a lower plain, will he not know it immediately, and will he not race as light to scorn and attack? Now then if you are as Solomon, who did not mean to do what he did, for there are abilities of people, and he is right in keeping the ways of his kingdom, and so it is also for the Hebrew Jews, that for those who must keep clean to their kingdom, and what they belong with, yet it is right for them to do so, and yet there are still other things upon Earth, and there are other things in other parts of Israel. Now then will not the Priest of Anothoth be faithful, so that you learn, as the Lord's children from a spirit, what is acceptable for you, for Solomon plain is not low, and is upon among the clouds, as Bethlehem is among the clouds. Now I do not give you anything firm here, for you must be able to learn on your own, for you must discover what you are, if you are having problems with the Priest of Anothoth. Now then banish him, or Anothoth, the spirit also, and all that is not clean, and show no mercy, for you do not harm to any within you. Now the priest is making the land clean, and Bethlehem is raised up, and those of the Hebrew Jews who say, yet we are keeping to our own ways, being the Christ, not having the Christ over us, fulfilling as the Christ, each being the Christ who is not succeeding as he succeeded in obeying all, and we keep to our own ways, the angel knows it is good, and the priest of Anothoth will believe it more firmly than them, and Saturn, the kingdom of the angel, brings about that which is of plains of the mountain, and not the mountain that has been known about, and not the mountain of Noah, that there are the gods, not gods, and they do not say, I am a god, for the Lord is their God, and they dwell upon the plain of Bethlehem, and there are those who must not speak to others, and there are those for whom the foolishness of the world is not offering peace and prosperity to what is better. Now if any is a stumbling block to any, then there should likely be segregation, for there is not stumbling block, but they step over an open space among the mountain, and they are for another mountain that is the mountain of their people, and so there are two people that need more segregation and is there then people missing that there are wandering travellers who do not have all of their society with them? But an ecologist does not place the other continents plant among the forest of another continent less there be trouble for the forest, and then does God? But God has said to the ancient Jews, do not be among other people groups, has he not? Now this is even going as far as David, on the plains of Tel Eton, and Solomon even, and yet the angel's kingdom brings the plains by the way of the raising of the land with the mountains, that there are more valleys and more levels of plains, that people of one plain might be scolded by the priest of Anothoth for speaking to people or considering even people in way who are on another plain, and the priest is a spirit, and not a man coming to you that he scolds you with evil. Now go not to another plain and give advice that would make sense upon your plain, for it is foolishness, and it becomes burdensome. Now if you are wise, and you have given advice upon another plain, yet you may have confirmation that it is not good, for the wise have committed this folly. Now who will be a priest here? But Heaven has provided it. Now extinguish what is not clean for you, and yet it is clean for another group. Now if you will be consumed and eroded by Saturn, keep yourselves clean of all that is not your way in obedience to God, for that which goes into the fire and comes out is not the hand, and the blade goes in, and some things go in and they are not worse for it, but better, and there are those who are refined in the fire by the Lord.
	Now I have kept secret the declarers of praise to some extent, for why should they be burdened? Now let the plains contend, I said to myself, for they must live, and keep to the plain, and do no meddle when they obey the Lord in their wars. Now then upon our plain, the plain where Lucifer is found, we have our own wars if there are to be wars, for the Muslims are a people for things of great highness, and as are the Japanese, and all those of the angel's kingdom, those making up the realm of what the angel brings, to be at peace and be good for those who will again be the Lord's inheritance, and all of the Lord's people, who have the sun, the High-Priest, who sits with the beast at one side of him, in Sion and Zion, the much larger realm, for there was catastrophe, and did not some say, it is the Apocalypse, and yet it was not nearly as bad, and after such there came the fourth day, and the third Heaven, and the sun rose upon the fourth day, and yet has it not already been written that there will be what is far greater, when God sits in New Jerusalem? Now will any say blasphemy? But they blaspheme, and they rebel, and yet time is given to understand, for Joshua was known about thousands of years prior. 
	Now there is the two ways of following Christianity for the Hebrews and those who are not Hebrew, that one is being the Christ who fails, and the other rescued by the Christ, who did not fail, that they might be the Lord's other child, and this occurred during the third day, and does it not still continue? Now the secular Jews of the Hebrew portion, they pray to God, and the Hebrew Jews of Moses and those in the portion of Elijah, they stand on either side of the Christ, the Lord's son. Now the Christ said of the disciples, these are my brothers, for did not his brother's reject him? But does the Christ not have consideration for the Hebrew Jews in saying these are my brothers of the disciples and not of his brothers? Now are not the Hebrew Jews supposed to keep themselves clean according to what is right for them, that they not mingle one group's things with another group's things? Now neither the Hebrew Jews or none Hebrews are adopted, and people do have an advantage in what they are, if one is being among another group, and yet the things I have believed to be false in the New Testament have already been mentioned. Now the Christ taught the Law of Moses as it pertains to the secular Hebrew Jews, that it is another way of obeying the Law of Moses, and the Pharisees were not those of Moses, but they were group of foolishness that had emerged. Now then are you then the Christ, that those of Moses and Elijah stand on either side of you? But you are not, and yet the Christ fulfilled all. Now have you not fulfilled all of what Moses fulfilled or Elijah? Now yet those of Moses still stand at the side of Him, who is the Lord's son. Now there is Saturn come to Earth, that rests upon Bethlehem, and it is the third Heaven, and yet will there not come a time when God will sit in New Jerusalem? 
	Now if the Priest-King will not recognize the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, yet the angel will. Now will the Hebrew Jews be disappointed in what God asks of them and the Earth? Now is the Priest-King meant to commit foolishness, that he sins in a way? But the angel does not sin in this thing, nor does the angel sin to the killing of a nation, even to the second, even to the third, and all its life, and yet the whole Earth he sins in, if it would ever be so that such should occur. Now why will any say, a person with wisdom, they should sin, and commit folly, for why will you be disappointed, because the wise have integrity towards God? But reason considering God, and not a leader, and so you honour a leader who is appointed by God, who is not as those brought about to be anointed by man, but anointed by God. Now by the mixing of greek and Zion there is as if a limp, and yet it is as health to some, and yet to be fully greek, the angel can do so, and to be fully Zion, is it not what is hoped for? Now then is there belief that there is anything wrong with being fully greek, that you reason in terms of things of man and woman, considering such things, using the words of Babel with integrity and righteousness? But if there is war, do not people of Zion use things of Babel, because they have expanded the vocabulary for what is only to be taken for granted, that such is used in war also? Now as for sub-concious, it is a thing of religion whether first or second, and a thing of Babel, whether first or second.
	Now who is unintelligent and ignorant, that they hate and oppose a thing without any understanding? But are not the Hebrew Jews, who kept people out, who would not mingle with other people, understanding the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, for they are men, and such is not even Bethlehem, but Israel that would understand it. Now as such, Israel, and only them it seems, and yet there may be a few others, are not right to hate an Egyptian, and yet as for Nephtali and all others, they keep to their integrity and Egypt is a burden and a disgusting thing to them. Now the Hebrew Jews, were they not once as Egypt in their common sense, and yet they were taken to the promised land. Now so was their bondage in Egypt, when they had less common sense. Now then is the scripture wrong? But the scripture is not wrong. Now the Lord's inheritance, is it to be raised up as the land raises up under them? Now from such a type of common sense as the Egyptians the Hebrew Jews emerged long ago, not being Egyptian themselves, but a different people, and so what is good is good. Now if the Hebrew Jews are not supposed to hate an Egyptian for the cause of history, this is also guidance against what is wicked, for does not the Lord's inheritance know what is acceptable? Now then they are given Bethlehem, and the ten commandments are the steps for the men, and the steps for the women in what ways they are for the women, and yet there are a people who are animals and believing in animal nihilism, and they say, it is what men do, and they speak it without understanding of women, for women know what a man is and yet an animal knows nothing about people, men or women, and the woman who says, men are God, but does not have God, she speaks of being a nihilist, and he who makes himself God, he is a slave, for a better man cannot very much make an attempt, and a servant cannot go further than a bow. Now then the life of a servant is of great worth, but a slave is killed without guilt, and they are of the flock of slaughter. Now a servant is a life for life, and they are killed for the same reason as any person if they deserve to die, that if there are brutal slaves mocking they might know they speak against themselves.

The paradigm of people. The devil worshippers, having abandoned the limitations of cause and motivation by exceeding boundaries are then known to be devil worshippers whether they are so consciously or not. Whether a person is aware or not of their behaviour and the consequences of their behaviour for others and the environment it effects does not change the level of iniquity and ill motivation required to conduct such behaviour. For whether conscious or not the ill motivation is equal when a person is engaged in evil.

The very respectful people are not always very compatible with the majority sensibilities of respect, for the average citizen is as if from one city and the very respectful from a different city.

Now then a spirit has said, and not I, the reverse reality of the slave, reverse bullying, they are tunnelling further into their own sphincter of the haunch and trying to get to the sky, to break orbit.

Now then Zion waits for Heaven and with a cloud of confusion there are men placing faith in their procrastination and the cloud will outlast the generations and disappear and never give rain. Now it goes up as a curtain that separates Damuscus from Zion and it keeps from aiding Zion. Now then the cloud of confusion, let it lose its power for the hope is confused by it that the hope is not with God for they do not join the Lord in many things and the curtain of confusion, it keeps David back in many things and it is a Greek magic that comes from what is void and nothing for there is none higher than David and the meeting place has not a king’s throne or a strong command of people. Now in some things then there is the open divides and neutral ground and there is much neutral divide and ground in Eretz Chadrack. Now then Joab treads the neutral ground and kills there and other places and yet there is that domain not his where he does not belong, for he may not be many types of terrorists or he is no longer Joab. Now are there not some claiming to be of Joab and yet what they are pursuing is that which Joab defends. Now if the devil is claiming to be of Joab then does he not also claim it even against Joab? But indeed he does. Now the devil’s servants who blaspheme him by speaking as if they are not his, they will not say they are an atheist or believer but they are claiming to be what is not a bastard and not any people, but they claim to be a mongrel and that which does not choose or have anything and does not know much about anything and is rebellious and rude, an anarchist and brimstone is their rebellion and fire their zeal of an impure fire and they love to be Luke-warm and they eat of what they find and they blaspheme and bring forth foolishness for their rebellion is spoken for the good and yet they strongly defend the evil and do not know it. Now unruly, they declare we are freedom fighters and rail against freedom fighters whose ways are peaceful and two in ten things are good that they say and the rest scattered to fight each other. Now it is idle people in the street who pass and speak to each other as they linger and idle is the meditation it seems that passes by and picks up what it can. Now it profits nothing and is sorrow and the sand shifts and the shadows loom and they will drink tomorrow and there is merry making and here there is that of value. Now then they are the vegabonds in the street lingering and eating, an unruly lot, tough and quick to fight and the angel says, let them be having homes and food and drink, and the devil’s servants, let us do greater evil in Ria that the people should believe it acceptable things. Now have not the vagabonds in Mala sought to cast out those not so and this in Ria? Now mongrels and vagabonds and not a bastard among them and at the Nile they often dwell and in all the streets of all the cities and the angel must ignore them if they rage for they will not take homes that are offered and food and drink and great things they will not take and it is continuously offered to them. Now for what cause do you make war? But they form and make war at times, and what can be done, for they are not Egyptian as Egyptians and yet they are more a portion of Egypt, seeming much as that of the Nile, and yet they do not really know what occurs and for what reason they really make war. Now their general, do they know them, or really know their name? Now a belief in what is wrong is why they war, and yet not knowing what occurs they attack that they do not fight what they seem to believe they fight, for they gather up bits of information where they can, and they go to war before knowledge is had.

Now those with God, leaning on Him, they are not deceived by the truth of the deceiving man, and yet those divorced from God, the truth of the deceiving man is truth for them that is able to be leaned on, and nothing else is required, for the lies of it are a firm conviction and a strength of righteousness for him, and quickly he will go out to vouch for his neighbour and fight with him against his enemies, and at that time the truth will not be heard by him any longer, for stubborn he will be in his conviction, for his righteousness is the lies of the deceiving man and no other consideration will enter in and no doubt will be had by him. Now it is not so with those who are leaning on God.

Now there is a wise woman who has a role of judging and judgment in moral matters and things of justice, and let her have the name Lucy if she wants it, for it is for Lucifer, and not for the devil, for relying on the Lord, fearing Him, leaning on Him, polite and yet waiting for truth, that she may be polite and yet not quick to know the truth, always keeping ready to know the truth again, that the truth may be found, she may have the name Lucy if she desires it and if she is a wise woman. Now beautiful she is, with integrity, possessing justice and fairness, covered by every smooth stone.

Now is there not a planet that I know of that is called Simp? Now is it not larger than I? For I am as a third moon. Worth trillions, I know what is priceless, and a trillion am I, and the Earth cannot sustain me, for I would break the continent that I rest upon, indeed it is good, for broken it would be raised and formed, and yet they cannot bear this thing, for a man cannot be a mighty nation.

Now then a trillion is there, and the angel is a trillion, for he is 1000 and a trillion, for he is 1000 trillion, and so he is a ball and a figure, and a rainbow is about him, for the ball is as a sun, a star, and the figure, as a cloud, and the rainbow, around the ball, and by the number it may be known. 

Now then what will the Earth give? But will they give one-thousand-trillion of their currency? But it cannot seem to be, for a man cannot be a mighty nation, and he would establish his throne, and the continent will break and be reformed as light, and silver would be the continent, covered with light, a thin layer of mist, of light, and who is able to perform it, and who can say, our nation will give it that it is to happen? For reason knows what is possible for them, and that they are found worthy with what they have, and it is good. 

Now then to America, I have already given speaking to you at your places, and so it should be done, for I desire it, that understanding might be there, for how can what is there be forgotten? But there are princes of the zefar or elun or elum for it is the two names of them and either they may call themselves and princes they are of a planet, for they are princes among the elum and even thrones some of them have, being princes, for it is so by mala, if they will desire to understanding it. Now then I am not their father, and yet princes they are of Saturn, for the elum are of Saturn, and their greatest danger is to become philistines and enter the service of the devil for they must keep to the integrity they must keep and their ways are not the ways of the Jews. Now the devil's service is the ruin of them that the devil may have them as servants. Now America, does it have any princes of the elum? Now what is the tradition of Heaven? But the leaders of them came and then later the king, from Heaven, born on Earth, to know if the people will raise their king born to them, a child born to them, that would later be their king, and such was the case with the Jews, the Hebrew Jews, that a child was born to them, that their people should raise Him and it would be known, and then He would be their king, born to them, kept safe by them, for among His own He was born. Now Heaven is not as men and women, and their ways. But the Jews killed their king, and those who were philistines at one time, who had been zefar who had converted to the devil, that David did a good work for Saturn as well by removing the abomination of it, for the zefar should not be harbouring Belzeebub in them, and committing wickedness and indulging in ways of wickedness, for it is possible for the zefar for they are different than Jews, these later departed from this evil, and was it not after the Christ that much of this departing happened, for they are a people as angels, as angels on Earth, and they should not be converting to the devil. Now then they were elum again and zefar and they were no longer philistines, and yet do not the prophecies still call them philistines? Now it is good, in my opinion, that they do still call them philistines. Now there are elum who have had kingdoms in mala, and very much in the fashion of an elum, in the fashion of the Heavens, and I am not their father, nor am I their king, for they know of religion and mala, and the elum are a people as angels on Earth.
	Now unto us a child is born was said of the Jews, and so unto you who are elum, unto you a child was born, and knowing it not, the devil has sought to sow discord by other people groups in mala. Now as for the Muslims, if you are not angels, the Muslims are not able to regard you, for to them you are men and women as others, and yet men and women who are very worthy, or is it not so? Now you are then regarded for what you are, and the things that all people regard according to what is holy. 

Now offend not the healers head for he must concentrate and there is much that does not offend him that others cannot perform without offence and they have their own society that they answer to as is acceptable, for I said, I will not touch them and they are not soldiers, either, and neither are the people, and the priests of other things that worked with the healers, for they too were for wellness, they had no king and were not soldiers and should not be made frightened. Now then it was considered, do not attempt to do so you who come from places of war where there is more evil, and there will be these priests for Bethlehem because they may be aiding religion when Babylon has been purged from them that when the ignorance of Babylon is completely defeated and purged they will be aiding religion and the religious for these priests who are with healers they will be in Bethlehem and they will no longer be tax-collectors but holy priests who aid the holy, for Babylon will no more give them mandates to do any foolishness and their knowledge will be expanded and people will even be going to them for recreation, for Babylon will be gone from the land. Now then what they called psychiatrists will be called physcillies and their knowledge will be expanded and they will also be offering recreation and they will be for all the people.

Now a psychillies will not give anything addictive in those days and the truth will be adhered to in what is addictive for Babylon will be eradicated. Now ceremonies of wellness will be for all people that are conducted by the psychillies and they will be by choice for the public and though it is better not to be going to such ceremonies yet they are permitted and those who chose to may do so and they are recreation for it is not wrong in any way and yet no person will be forced to the ceremonies for such is assault. Now does not the devil know how to dismantle and destroy by discord and evil that he may attempt to force people and force people to do things of choice in Zion, for it takes out a pillar and a wall and a roof falls and the people are scattered and the next part of the city is then attacked in a similar way. Now if the angel knows this strategy than does not the devil? For when Zion is a heap of ruins and foolish chaos and even sin then the devil will begin his kingdoms. Now the ceremonies are even aiding some in religion and yet none may ever be forced to anything. Now if the people are pleased yet the wise elders must consider the devil and his attacks, and there is always war. Now it is the dismantling attack where people are among the people and representing the wickedness of the way the nation works, for they do injustice to the people of that land, and by this way they remove a pillar and then a supporting wall and the roof collapses of a city building, and these of the many large buildings that represent the aspects of the city. Now at times the people may rightly crumble such a building that it is not needed, and another building will be built, or many, for they have chosen a better thing instead. Now for Zion it is the foreign army of the devil that would sow discord that the kingdom would collapse into ruin.

Now a squadron of grave-diggers I have, by mala, the most respectful people, and if there is that so dead that it is ground into the ground, that it rises up from the beneath the ground and tries to kill, for it is beneath the Earth, in the graves of the Earth, that it emerges to kill where there is no cause, then the grave-diggers will move the body further away, for the corpse is dead, and yet how will they cremate it? But I do not know all.

Now the dead are offended by what is not, for there is offence on behalf of some and yet there is no offence that has caused it, for it is as war that they attack the enemy, and yet the enemy is hating what they hate and is for those they would defend. Now then what will be done with these type who rise from beneath the Earth, for if other of the dead are calling out in their wait for Heaven, that they support life and good, to call out what is good, for these have life coming for them, yet they must wait, and I too am in wonder why they must wait, for what do I know? Now if the dead are emerging, some, to kill what is not guilty to a degree to be killed, then will not the gospels be preached to them that they might have life, and will they be taken to Heaven prior to those who wait? Now then the Christ has given more wisdom, and I had considered, the grave-diggers will deal with it, and yet the gospels preached to them, they may ascend to Heaven early.

Now the grave-diggers and Damascus, are they not both defended by the dead who dwell beneath the Earth, and some things are defended by them, that which cannot abide the wisdom I give about them, these are defended by them, and those they might attack, are these not good to then be preaching the gospels to them that they might ascend to Heaven early? Now what is the report of them who are waiting? But the Christ has done exceeding good to me by them who are waiting.

Now then do not lie about standard things of knowledge concerning the Bible, the foundational things that all people know that concern language of things foundational to language and not things of translation or lack of knowledge of translation, for if you are lying in this way about the foundation of the scripture, it is not moving stones. Now it is splitting the Earth that spirits rise from the abyss, and love is on my lips, indeed hope and the dwelling of waters, indeed a kiss that cannot happen, and my eyes pure, for coveting upon coveting I desire that which has arisen from the opening of the Earth, by the wickedness of wicked slaves, and a voice pure, as pure water, and my heart has coveted overlapping to covet and goodness, for there so with her, and not the abyss from which she came, there is Heaven for me, also, that I will war with her with love until she blushes, and yet I have not defeated her that I know of. Now then if she will be the Christ's, give her to me, after she is safely in Heaven, and she has encouraged me, with good, for when the slaves had committed their evil and I was fighting with the the devil's spirits, she rose and encouraged me. 

Now there were men who were doing the work of the devil's priests, of demons, for they were demons on Earth, and they were driving away men from women, robbing them, and those men who bowed to the devil, who stood before him, and even Kir, who stood beside the devil, they were supporting the effort of these men who were driving off a man from the women, for with accusations the priests of the devil accused the man, and wicked and foolish accusations, as foolish as Kush, as the low places of Kush, and those men who stood before the devil, even those in the service of the soldiers of cities, they supported this thing, for the devil's kingdoms were not divided. Now these men were the rocks beneath the Earth, the rocks exposed where there is a water-fall that were beneath the Earth, and those who are before the devil, deeper rocks, where there is fire. Now then demons had partnered with those who stood before the devil. Now have not the demons spoken lies and said, we too have the right to something, and it is us you rob? But indeed only they who rob, and it is written, you shall not steal, for to steal the layers of justice of land, and those things that are offered or refused by the committing of injustice that people may not take what is offered if it is offered, this is the robbing of the Lord and people both, and it is written, though shall not steal. Now if any robs the Lord, what does He demand of them? Now then him who gives to the Lord what the Lord demands to be given, does not the Lord repay him? But does any not believe in God, or that He is God? But if you are righteous to give good for good, do you not know that the Lord is greater than you and more righteous?

But what has the spirit from the abyss said, in encouragement? Now believe it the abyss in hell? But the abyss of the Earth. Now she said repeatedly in encouragement, keep throwing them in, for the spirits of the devil were mentioned to be thrown into the lake of fire. Now then was she not waters beneath the Earth, that had not risen yet to be given to the Earth? For I considered, after what I had written in this book, and believed her to be waters from beneath the Earth.

Now then when the waters beneath the Earth have risen to the sky, will it then rain upon the Earth? But will there be a new river upon the Earth? 

Now when you war with a nation a man will come out from that nation, many from their doors to speak peace with righteousness for war is war and it is acceptable and at the times of peace they will do so. Now he will say in his heart, may you live and fight this war and live, for you will not hate him who is a soldier in your nation and the woman who takes a sword you will grab her hand and bruise it with your integrity that the sword clatters for you will not permit her to attack the soldiers, and keep your house in order while there is war in your land that your children not depart from peace, for quick you will be with the woman among you who takes a sword and your children will not leave the house of peace, and those who will fight as soldiers will go the long and right way before they fight.

Now witch-hunters will work with the deadly house-cats and the Wicca witches will not be harmed or persecuted if their ways are religion and peace. For if they are not being devil-witches that are terrorists by the consideration of them then for what reason will they be troubled? Now then their wisdom, also, will not be destroyed and neither the wisdom of anything that it is good to be knowing, even the evil that might be in some places for those of other religions. Now then you will not persecute the Wicca witches or burn their wisdom for it is priceless for me to know what they believe and if there are things I might consider from what they believe.

Now a female slave was going around with the spirit of Jaraboam because she was jealous, for slaves have no gender, and she said of the innocent, the gentle, they will not be a beater of women, for she did not fear the number of the beast and liked the work of the devil. Now better she had been blinded by a sword than she should have become what she is. Now more man than a man was she.

Now then what intimidates and is made for war, it is not good, and is rightfully hated and defended against when it is in society among those not soldiers, for the people are not soldiers and are different from the soldiers. Now then such things of sexuality that are bullying, are not to be against the people, and it is a valid complaint, and not of simplicity, and right to be defended against.

Now then for those who are guarded, give peace to the woman and do not trouble her, and give privacy to those who guard you, from what is not forbidden for you, for wisdom is better, indeed excellent.

Now should not the saw be for Jeraboam in the killing of him? For he goes out and saws at the better trees and the worse trees both else I would have declared that he is not Jeraboam. Now is it because there are trees he will not saw that he is then great? 

Now there are the women who have integrity and they do not acknowledge God, but acknowledge the kami and yet they acknowledge God still and yet do not consider it, for such is their people.

Now the woman who acknowledges God, but by kami, she is being much acknowledging God.

Now there is the horse that has butted the person, because she likes him, and that which bites at injustice, because of fondness, and these things are saying, you must understand, for they are demanding understanding of others. Now then is this not a thing of Bethlehem already come through to the people, that areas of Bethlehem had already emerged? Now Bethlehem is among the clouds.

Now then Dagon, the eye.

For what reason did the philistines sacrifice anything to God or to angel? But it is confusion, at least from the angel's perspective, and is it not from confusion? Now we have a role, we who are on the angel side, and for what reason does any on the angel side sacrifice? But is it for confusion? Now there are women who might burn small incense, candles, to an angel, and so then she must be the wife of an angel, else it is not right. But has there not been much confusion? But because there was no knowledge prior, she did not burn anything to anyone, for without the knowledge of such, it was only confusion again, much like sacrifice is nothing, and confusion. Now an army has come to Earth to do good, and some of them are burning objects and animals suddenly, and it is to me? But I write this to explain how confusing it is, and that it is nothing, for you are not Jews, and you do not do what the Jews do, for the Hebrew Jews are the Lord's inheritance, and they offer sacrifices, but why would any of you do this thing? Now then if you are guarding the land of them, while they are carrying out their honour to God, this would be understandable.

Now Cias and Cessus are fair, smooth stones, as are some other of those like them, and the giant lady, she is a pervert, jelous and greedy for secrets. Now in the garden is the serpent, the angel, who is not the devil, and there is Mars, and David, and Solomon, and Adonijeh, and Prince Rellium, and Prince Fellium, and the serpent is the length of ten or twenty smooth stones.

A good clay stone: Now the world can be divided in two: the losers and the cheaters, and the losers will not mind their own business in a moral way, for because they do not do, they would attack those who do things that are good, for they say, none shall succeed at anything, and the cheaters, they do not really cheat in what they do to do well, if they will do well. Now it is meant in the context of where it applies, for the people turn stones to mud quickly.

Now when the fire grows hot, the clay turns to mud and soon the stone is used where it should not be, and the clay stone is gone.

Now for the princes of the elum, there has been much confusion in ancient times and much they did not understand that to learn the ancient wisdom is to not always gain knowledge, but some knowledge and gained and ignorance is sometimes gained with knowledge, for the elum did not understand correctly many things, and they even offered sacrifices, did they not? Now this is confusing, and yet it is not confusion concerning the Hebrew Jews, for they are the Lord's inheritance. Now then the elum are on the side of angels, for there are the two sides, the children of God and those on the side of the angels, and the Hebrew Jews, they are on the side of the children of God, and there is then the right understanding, for those on the side of the angels have a role and the people are the children of God, that they do not have a role, as it might be written, for there is not always sufficient language to express the concepts of such. Now then if you are able to purge the ancient wisdom and knowledge of the lies than it might be able to aid you, but more truth might be written by the wise of the zefur rather than rely much upon the ancient writings and what they have gathered. Now there is indeed ranks of angels? But the Lord is the head of every angel, for Heaven does not do things as men and women do things on Earth even if the angels are an army. Still, the angels are not an army as the armies of Earth are that you believe men and women are parellel in their armies to the way the armies of the angels might be, for men and women do things differently than Heaven. Now mala is fascist in a way, and yet is such right for men and women? But it is written, may it be on Heaven as it is on Earth, and so then is their democracy to become fascist? But is this the degree of fascism where fascism is right to be for men and women? Now democracy is the domain of Solomon and David, and they have not had fascism here that their domain might be right had by them, and fascism happens at a greater, and larger place. Now there is no head of any angel but the Lord, even if there are ranks of angels.
	Now the stones, the rocks of Esua that are exposed when there is a collapse of the soil, these are right to be sent back to their own domain, their own fields, and they are hard and jagged stones, large and like bricks and harsh in harshness, and they have no business to be on Earth, for they belong under the Earth and they are on land sometimes. Now kick them or try to throw them away, they are large and weighty rocks, too big to be picked up unless it is by a very mighty man and even he will soon use a wagon. Now then people cause themselves injury by trying to pick these stones up and cast them away because they are jagged and weighty, even though they belong under the Earth. Now why is the world so dangerous? But there are even large stones upon Earth, and they are not fitting for the Elum who are like angels on Earth. Now must the Elum be so wise? But there is that which goes beyond what they must be, in terms of wisdom.
	
Now the angel did not become a refugee like many others during the seiges that took place in which many people were removed from homes to walk the valley and even the desert, to cross it, where many were taken in to the homes of others like guests because of the seiges of the devil. Now the seige took place for a year and a half, and the angel kept working during that time and did not abandon the small tower, and there was much that took place, even that that David will have to deny that cannot be public knowledge of what occurred because of the seiges for there was more terrorism than only the seiges that the devil was carrying out, and the angel became Solomon of a type, and the Lord gave him a helmet that he could not take off, and he continued to work, even during the actions of David, and he did not become a refugee and had homes that were not others, dwellings not grande, as he passed through to other places, for there was much tumult and turmoil during that time of the plague. Now he was provided for with what little could be provided for him, that he did not lack anything that is needed and only a little luxury he had. Now the nation was not equipped to be able to give anything like riches or much to him, because of their ways, and they too were in hiding in much, for it was a bad time, and they would have persecuted them if not for their concealment of much. Now to what will I compare it? But before the war that was waged by Hitler, and even being occupied a little, during the war. Now be not too quick to hang traitors, not traitors. Now who were the traitors and who was fighting the war that they were required to use concealment and craftieness? But were they not taking risks? Now weigh their actions, with truth, if they are to be later suspected of being a traitor, for if you are doing the will of the devil after the war is over, you are continueing the war on the devil's behalf, and it is a greater sorrow of the rocks of Esua, that he does it, and he kills those worthy of praise for their valour and their beauty, because they are to ascend to Heaven, to be taken by God? But God has not asked for them yet, or is it not so? But the rocks beneath the Earth, exposed by the collapse of soil, where there is a water-fall, they reach up to take more soil, and more trees, and beautiful trees, golden, with golden bark and golden leaves, on soil that is gold dust, and the rocks reach up after war to take more soil, to take the beautiful trees into the Earth? Now fool! Wicked! But hold your hand in the other hand Esua, for you are partnered with Jeraboam in this thing, and it is the will of the devil. Now the most beautiful trees that can come about because of the war, that are there after the war, these will be cherished, for they are already cherished by the light, by the light that falls upon them, when there is light, for the light is the truth when the truth weighs them and not ignorance and wickedness that weighs them. So the pit, the chasm, will be covered over with soil, with rocks and soil and the grass will grow over the pit again, and the beautiful trees that have golden bark and golden leaves on soil of gold dust, they will remain and be cherished by the light. Now crafty were these trees and valiant in their risks, in their concealments of much, for they did much craftieness and wisdom during the war and did not fight with battle-bows and such things, but took risks and saved many. Now they are called traitor trees, beautiful and golden, for they are the Lord's traitors. Now what is their name? But it is Trees of the Other Realm. Now some have even before to be Trees of Heaven.

Now then will you not then realize? But as it is in Mala, so it should be on Earth. Now do my people still have to be told this? But they have understood prior. Now then build a thing for the Trees of Heaven, and the Trees of the Other Realm, and honour this thing with ceremony, as you honour the soldiers. Now will you not make a bridge that is golden? For the bridge is to Heaven. Now a thing to be for the trees and the bridge that is to Heaven. Now the bridge is golden, its wood is golden wood, and its railings are brass, indeed gold for brass. Now gold for wood, and gold for the railings. Now high is the bridge between buildings, among the clouds.



There is a pale house, with pale bricks, and each of the bricks a brick-stone, made with craftiness, and the names of these bricks should be known: (they are playing): [I'm not really leaving], [we'll only honour the dead(or those nobody would know)], [we'll only honour anyone but you], [the name of another stone]. Now these are stones of the spies, of Cias and Cessus, smooth stones, that these stones are found in their wilderness among the people who carry out operations in the cold war. Now the making of these stones, it goes to infinity, for there may be infinity stones made, so that the houses made of these stones, for there may be seperate houses, they grow large in mala in a realm of fog and lakes. Now such is their land, of castles, stone houses, fogs, and lakes. Now is there not some loch-ness dragon in the lake where there is mist? But it is a place of fog, of cold temperatures and not often hot, of mild weather, mostly, and yet mist and fog, ghosts and assassins, and they go into the lakes where the secrets of people are stored for fear of theft, for they are lakes and not clouds, and the lakes are not safe from spies of many nations and neither are the lakes from which they come from, and there is at present, lake fog-horn and lake goondle and there are the smaller lakes that are speckled about the land that are too numerous to count. And there are the darklands, the underground caves and tunnels, that are tor and darkplaces and there is much that occurs in tor that the spies of Cias and Cessus do not know about. Now the serpent is not the levethian, or loch-ness, for he dwells in the light, on land, and he may also go beneath the water if it is required. For I write of the serpent who is the angel. Now then Cias and Cessus should know and they would be able to testify to it. 

Now the spiritual promised land of the stones as Cias and Cessus, it is in a place called Scotland and England and this is their promised land, that they do not inhabit, for such is not their people that they would inhabit a promised land. Now there is also a neutral mountain there that is for the peaceful things and non-peaceful things of all the kings and queens of the Earth, and yet it seems to have no power unless there is a great war having happened, and the mountain, the power of it, was made by war, for it expanded and gathered into a mountain when it had drawn back in. Now what was this thing, if the scientists of nature know, that expanding, gathered rock, and made for itself a mountain, and the mountain having power of peace to be used by all the kings and queens, to carry out strategy and things of merchants in things that none can carry out commerce in. Now the mountain is peace, honoured in religion, in the hearts of men, for though it was made with evil, yet it is good, they say, that honouring God, they also honour the mountain and yet not the things of others. Now it is because the mountain, that is rounded, peaceful, able to be ascended, is made so in Mala, and not made so by men, using the workings of men, workings of Ria, and their strategics to make it, that it is honoured by much of the Earth as a valid thing to be honoured. Now the workings of Ria, of humans in carrying out workings of Ria, these workings attain little power, temporary things, built upon sand and they crumble and are nothing, for these workings of men, of Ria, they are dirt and sticks, rather than mortar and stone-bricks, and the wind gusts and they topple, and men kick these things built, and they crumble. 

Now the mountain of England and Scotland, it is a Greek mountain that they did not intend to form, and it is rounded, peaceful, and there is a meeting place, and not a Temple on it. Now it was even maintained by what they called The Queen, when she residing in her land, and she herself was a fair stone like Cias and Cessus, only not like them. Now the angel calls their land a garden of stones and mist, the land of spies.

Now a giraffe can be annoying to dwell with for they are nimble and yet seem as if they may knock people over or collide with them.

Now what is the loch-ness dragon? But lakes have been known to have such dragons at times, and they do not tell the truth about it, for it is seeming to be a secret, is it not? Now the dragons of lakes and Oceans are wanting to remain a secret, for being covert is much of their quality, and staying unknown is their quality. Now they are a ghost in the haze of water, and how big or large is unknown, and who they are or what is unknown, for what power causes them to appear in the lake, although they are not seen? Now truth will slay them, the dragons of the lake, and the Temple will send out soldiers, will it not, by way of the priests, who will give message to the soldiers. Or is it not so? Now does not a staff of the Lord write to you that it may be so? Now do not know a little, and be of disbelief in God. Now then the serpent will only tell you of what you already know, that there might be leeches, or specks upon rocks, or enemy messengers posing as friends, that there might be traitors, and all the things you should not trust. Now do they not place actors in a nation to cause mayhem, that there might be a spirit of such to turn against one's own neighbour? Now they must remove the pretty people, must they not, or there will be no anarchy. Now they must use those who cannot be easily dealt with, must they not? Now they must find ways to stir up trouble, and they must create trouble to fight against. Now they must be honest about what is a grievance and what is not. Now a foolish leader they must protect and defend that they might aid in the attack of a nation, and a good leader they must remove.

Now be wise against God in war, that He may be pleased with you, for if the Lord is about to attack you, be then wise, using all your wisdom, that he may be pleased with you, and be fearing God, and be of repentance, that you not be destroyed, for there is no wisdom against God, but the wisdom is for God. Now He may still punish you, and nothing can stop Him, and I will gladly attack if it is His will and I will have less mercy than Him. Now believe, then, with all your heart and mind, and love the Lord your God, and be rejoicing if He will Shepherd you, and be ready to receive all the blessings and rewards He has to give you, for as much as He can destroy and obliterate, He can as much reward and give every good gift and blessing, and does He not more desire good? For He created you did He not? Now think it was because He desired for something to punish? Now then you are a people for reward, for something to be rewarded, and to attain the Heavens, to attain much that you could not have even imagined, and more upon more of what you did not think to ask for, that is good. Now I write for the preparation of those who might find themselves in error, if the Lord finds them in error, that they might remember wisdom, to fear God, for there is indeed God, and He does indeed have power. Now then do not test God, but repent and also look at do what is wise, figuring out what is evil that might be remedied that the Lord will be pleased. Now then do righteousness and be righteous, will you not, if the Lord is displeased with you? Now free the prisoners wrongly imprisoned, and do justice where it should be done, and make right what has been slandered, and restore money to whom has been robbed, and make right your ways, and quickly, the whole nation, for will you not inquire into what the Lord is displeased about? But is there a wise man who will inquire, and know what things are displeasing the Lord? Now they already inquire and tell you, and yet you do not listen, and you know what things displease the Lord, do you not? Now do not be persecuting in a wicked way, anything, and do not be doing injustice, but cease, free those you have imprisoned, remove lies, do what is right and make your nation clean that the Lord might not be angry.

Now then the dark shade that is Nephtali, for it is implied that they are dark shade, they are having their promised land that is not large, and it is in Nephtali, and yet even if they cannot be given the land, yet they have the land by mala.

Now where something is nothing by wisdom, being a thing of weight that is nothing by wisdom, do not bother to speak it, do not engage it, for does not the dog bite the hand, and put your hand not to the dog's mouth if it makes some noise that has no weight to you, for if he speaks of nothing, there is nothing, and yes or no, it does not matter, for it is a thing of nothing, of no person's business, of no relevance, that some speak what they want on these matters, for there is nothing, for what should not be discussed should not be discussed, being that which is no person's business. Now if a dog whines, then pet it, and if it growls, you do not pet it, for the life of a dog, also, is nothing, and yet a righteous man is merciful concerning it.

Now then, be increasing the ceremonies that you have for Sion and Zion, and Jerusalem, that you remember many things, for the days must be made long, because chaos has made them short. Now then the day is not the clouds of Ariel, but the rain falls and the day carries on as it will that you not use the rain of Ariel as the sundial of the days, or to direct what the days are, but they are rain, and what occurs is what is in the lives of a town or city. Now what occurs for the people, these are the days. Now then one crosses the bridge and falls to the pit of the water-fall, for they were a stone of Esua in the war on Earth, and they will fill the pit again, and another crosses the bridge and arrives safely, for they were soil, or a good stone, a stone of the mountains. So the pit will be filled where there is a water-fall, and the pretty will be re-instated that the water will not flow and destroy the land, and the pit will be filled with stones of Esua, those who hated beauty during the water, the traitors who were traitors according to what is true, and the stones of Esua already able to come upon land after the war, they will not be able to come up on land to take the good trees that were not really traitors, but those who had been crafty to save lives and to do good in their clandestine fashions. Now the stones of Esua, that were really traitors, those who were envious during the war and were really traitors, these will fall into the pit where the water-fall is, and the good soil, and the good stones that are not the stones of Esua that are beneath the Earth but are stones of the mountains, and the beautiful trees that are trees of the Other Realm and even Trees of Heaven, these will pass over the water-fall by the bridge to the other side. Now then will there not be a time of remembrance for the Trees of the Other Realm and the Trees of Heaven, and will not something be built for them? Now as you build things for soldiers, so too, are you not right to build things for the trees that have golden bark? Now people have passed over the pit to safety because of the wood that is gold and the brass that is gold, that is the bridge, for these trees are not wood, but they are gold.

Now do not call the asherahs by that name, because of Edom, and do not wear the suns upon you, because of Edom, for this is the advice I give, and asherahs are not really their name. For they are called Elsnon-pretty, that you remember not to attain the sickness of Edom with you. Now asherah, and what it means, it is perversity to speak, and Edom will make you ill. Now though the princes of the Elum may say in kindness, fertility god, and be well and not be sinning, yet are any of you a prince of the Elum?

Now here is where fascism happens. In the garden. For this is the right place for fascism, and democracy is for David and Solomon. Now there is an ant-hill in the garden, and yet not made by ants, and it was made by the method of a wise people, and yet made with war and evil, as they say, and there are the rocks, the pale, fair stones, such as Cias and Cessus, the colour of snow these stones, and there is the Giant Lady, and Mars who is the god of Zion, and David and Solomon, and the Zefar, and Jerusalem, the Hebrew Jew, and there is Sion and Zion, and the great thing, the sun, the Priest-King of Zion, and there is the serpent, the angel, and will there not be the Sarmatians? Now there are other things too in the garden, and each thing is a representative, for this is where fascism is by mala, and the serpent, the angel, is at one side of the garden, and the Priest-King of Zion, at the other side of the garden. Now the Priest-King of Zion has a special place, for he is the sun. Now he comes down the steps of his house to the garden, and far across the garden, on the other side, is the place of the serpent, who is the angel of the covenant. Now this is the garden which I do not know the name of. Now is it not called Pangea, this garden? But one side is the angel, the serpent, and on the other side, Sion and Zion, and it is called Pangea, if it is to be called anything, and there is the area of the spies and rocks and lakes, and there is the area of Muslims, the area of Jerusalem, the area of Neptali, the area of the Zion Jews, the area of Salem, even, if it will be believed, and the god of Zion has his own area if he has purchased the fruit from the tree, and David and Solomon are in many ways still over much and the Giant Lady, is she not with David and the smooth stones, for would any believe that she is of David? Now the Giant Lady is interested in the secret of all of Pangea. Now there is the area of the Elum, that is a curtain around the area of Jerusalem.

Now then there is Kursh, also, and Egypt, and the realm of Sarmatians, yet they are not with us, and there is the Island Nation, Japan, and there is China, the place of the beast, the woman who has wings, and there are other places as well, and the angel has not found out all the land of Pangea. Now will not the councillor of the Earth, Neptune, be found on Pangea somewhere, for he is not visible in the sky from Earth, and yet he is visible to Saturn, and is not Uranus his work, that he builds it? Now are there not representatives of the beast, the woman who has wings, always in the house of the Priest-King of Sion and Zion? Now are there not also the things that he knows to be right? But I have not prepared the way in all, and have not yet understood all that goes with the Priest-King of Zion. Now he make summary of the truth from the clouds of Ariel, does he not? Or am I mistaken? But he cannot use the Giant Lady, for she belongs to David and Solomon, to this domain. Now does he not give summary of the truth to all of Sion and Zion, and he is able to judge, is he not? Now he is more capable than by gathering the rain-drops of Ariel, for he gathers them better, and therefore is there not a pool that gathers water before his house, his Temple? Now it is not a fountain, but is a beautiful pool.
Now the whole Earth is Pangea again, if they will attain, and it was spoken about to the prophet Daniel, who had Michael as his Lord, and Daniel's name was Belsheezar. Now the fourth day comes, and the third day, how long has it lasted for? Now was there not the Enoch, who came early, the seventh from Adam, and the Lord took them, for they ascended, and nature was their religion, and they did not worship animals, but the Lord was their God. Now they are the lost continent, outside of Zion and Jerusalem. Now I looked, and it was not the religious people who would misuse the abilities of anything against religion, and it was not the atheists, but it was the Babylonians, only, who would misuse these things if they could, and the Babylonians were ruining the garden of Pangea, and only them, and they were atheists who believed, who would pray for being welcome into the groups of profit, people below Ur, having come up onto the beach from below Ur. Now they were ruining the garden and yet they were a small portion, barely noticed, not even one percent, indeed, perhaps a tenth of one percent. Now there were also the polytheists, and yet they were as if their own Island, and the polytheists understood polytheists, and they were a small Island, as if away from all of Pangea and yet many of them were not polytheists, who were around them, and they were then Muslims. 

Now Voodoo, it was nothing but barbaric combat using wickedness and no magic and every device that man could produce and every type of lie, for it was a thing of barbaric combat, of disgusting soldiers who were not worthy to be soldiers.

Now then there are many locations that might be right for things, but who can say where something may be placed? Now there are good things and horrible things, and there are things that I have not mentioned. Now I have not written of Latin America, only that the priests of them seemed to have ruined part of them, not being priests who knew what they were doing and what was right, and there were the Inca, who are believed to have been a very wise people, very moral, and there are the symbols used for language, where a mask may be for greed, such as a thief, or a tree with leaves, the name of a season, or a tree without leaves, the name of another season, and did they not ascend their better citizens? Now the steps to the sky continued on towards the sky, which would have removed light and left the people in darkness and condemnation, for it would have placed them in a valley of reverence and fear, and yet condemnation, a blanket placed over their whole head, over their eyes and ears, to drap them in darkness and obscurity, in condemnation also, and ignorance after their better citizens had been ascended by the priests. Now this is not the same as catholics.

Now it is only likely that much of the wisdom of philistines, some is giving that which might be useful and good and yet there is lies and ignorance that is sown among it as well, for there was much confusion, it seemed. Now still, they did not know, and what could they have gained in terms of great accuracy, but that they attained much that is useful. Now they had converted to what is wrong, to the devil, and so it was right that David should fight with them, and it is not pleasing to me, if they would even care, that they should be following after wicked ways and converting to the devil. Now they are a people as if angels on Earth, and yet if they are to become wicked, they may become very wicked, and even be host to Beelzebub, which is after they are ruined.

Now fascism is the higher level from the domain of David and Solomon, and it is way between the large things of Mala that are on Earth, that like is right to be defending and fighting on behalf of like, for this is good and praise-worthy when one is with a group that is good, that is for the Lord, and it is the truth, and some are on the side of the Christ, the side that saves for the purpose of redemption. Now the Christ is able to pluck adulterers against the devil from the realms of the devil's kingdoms, and they may even take a new name. Now the Earth is the Lord's and He created the Universe, and the Christ is His son. Now what is a Hebrew Jew burning sacrifice to an angel? But to an angel, at least to me, it would not be a pleasing thing. Now we come to you, the zefar, and the angel, to you who are the Lord's inheritance, and there may be a curtain of fire around you, for protection and for a cloud of butter and honey, and Jerusalem will be raised up, and we also come to you, the Japanese of the river, and the angel, and the Temple of the angel will have those who are of the ranks of the angels, and some of the Japanese will be with their own house, with their kami lord, the river, of their house, and are we not an odd house? Now we also come to you, or they come on my behalf, the Muslims, if there is wrong-doing and evil, for the Lord's servants come in this circumstance and they are not ordered to do anything by me, but they are the Lord's, and it is the Lord's whose they are, for the Lord has given them charge over a thing, and it is a great and large thing they are given charge over and they are a mighty nation, and their charge is concerning many things, and their charge is concerning angels who are the Lord's servants. Now do not think they do not only know what is right in much, and that they cannot do this, to only know. Now they have not shown to be wrong in large things prior.

Now the philistines called me Dagon, and the name is fine, and the Jews also called me Dagon, even the prophet Samuel. Now the philistines, I call them elum, elun, and zefar, because they are not lacking knowledge anymore in many ways, that they are able to know that Dagon was an angel, in the service of God, who is the Lord, as the Jews wrote, and it is scripture, only Dagon was left to Him. Now the extent of the philistines not knowing, and the confusion for the philistines and not knowing the will of them who they praised is evident by this also, that they took the ark of the covenant from the Jews and placed it in the Temple, in Ashdod. Now obviously this would not please me, and other things they did would not please, which is showing the confusion of that time, that they did not know what they did, and did not have sufficient knowledge even if they had discovered many things and then placed lies and ignorance in with those things. Now the angels, or what they call gods, are in service to the Lord, and they are the Lord's angels. Now we have a role, you are elum, and is there much use in still remembering the ancient past when people were confused? But you are not that people anymore, and you are having better knowledge now, that such happened thousands of years ago, even before the coming of the Christ, who is the word. 

Now brutal man she is called who learns early, in her youth, the type of bullying that when there is a moment of encouragement and good for another she lashes out to give discouragement. For such is she a brutal man, evil, and not being mean, but being a combat soldier, making this method a device of combat to be as brutal as she can be, for she does not grow angry, she desires to kill, to strike as hard as she can in times of peace, when there is no contention. Now a jaw she has, and heavy it is, and a brutal jaw, a mean dog's jaw, and a quick dog's ears and eyes to perceive chance to attack. For she is the bludgeon of our enemies, which is her name, a brute man with a club, who lingers with our people at nice places where there is peace, waiting to strike. Now to detainment she should be taken, and kept away from the people.

Now then with some measure of humour but seriously: Is it indeed disturbing that the king was born to them who are older? But is this really a disturbing thing? Now then if any is trying to be insulting to any to sow discord, they are indeed enemies of our people who are trying to sow discord and trouble for the kingdoms of the Lord. Now none stands with them, that it is assumed as knowledge that none stands with them in these attempts to sow discord and trouble, even if the person is not there to say it.

Now to what will I compare the ancient wisdom of angels, the gods, that is present with the philistines and other people in that region who were not Jews? But it is as the credible carriers of news going about with those who write foolishness about the famous for entertainment, and they have joined hands that those who write foolishness should be able to place their things in much of the credible giving of truth so that I have decided it is not for me to read or of any interest to me any of the time, and so let there be upright scholars and such things, who have wisdom, if they desire to document anything during this time, for they are not found in the writings of ancient times. Now then half was credible documentation of things, and the other half what they call tabloid, and it was mixed much of the way through. Now who is Shalash? I have never heard of her, nor met any of her, or perceived her by wisdom.

Now as for those people who are drawn to producing praise and worship songs to Dagon, who are elum, I do not know. I do not know if this is right or not, only that it is acceptable to people to write encouraging songs about their king when they have a king or queen. Now even if it is serious for some, the thought of it, the consideration, has made me laugh, for I had not prior considered it. Now it is always remembered, of course, that angels, whether an angelic-god or not, to a people, are servants of God, who is the Lord.

Now many of our people, the zefar, too believe in justice, and the zefar are a people like angels on Earth.

Now clamorous is the voice of the enemy woman who sows discord between men, but she who loves what is right, lips of silver. Now whether cursing other men or defending, her lips are kept with silver, with good, and she may be called prudent.

Now healthiness, wellness, these are spiritual words of the zefar, and not words of Ria for them. Now they are words of wisdom. Now goodness the people are well, and by ugliness, unwell. Now yet there is that which is acceptable that makes itself ugly, and yet it is an acceptable thing, and their way it is, and they, too, are the elum. Now does not Salem dwell with the elum and the elum with Salem, and which is better, who will know? Now so the priests of Salem, a different people, who are your people, may even be among you. Now the angel has been this thing when he was younger, and yet not to the completion of it.

Now there was a barbarian movement that began with what is called September eleventh and it ran at a jog, and it stepped over the valley when it came, and it was refreshed with drink and sustenance of great energy and it soared down the next valley and flew well with excitement from the other side of the valley, and it gained speed, and only went faster and with greater excitement, and it was perverse and barbaric, and it was a greater portion of society and their aspirations and their stories of entertainment that had gone the other direction from the elum and the zefar and the things of no contention, for they scorned beauty as they had, and they made brute what would be beautiful, and it was the barbarian movement that continued. Now then will the movement not be cast aside, and cremated, and laid to rest under the Earth, that it might be washed away? Now the perversity is gone and the clouds come, and good things, and things that are hard to describe.

...Now then what will they say? But Kir and Kursh are cremated and buried and the water has washed them away beneath the Earth. Now hell, too, is gone and washed away.

Now Kursh is a fickle-girl, mud, who has no real problem, and Kursh calls to the sand that has little integrity.

Now the physician, every physician, is a dragon, a type of dragon they call dinosaur, for they have to be that they might do what humans are not willing to do. Now most physicians are the brontosaurus, and the Brontosaurus does not appreciate being patted with any meanness, or even kindness on the head, if any should wonder about this thing. Now have I not already written, do not offend the head of the physician, for he must concentrate on what he does? Now there are many types of dinosaurs that do not like to be patted on the head whether with kindness or meanness, that you not be confused. Now the Brontosaurus might be alarming to some, for people are not accustomed to be around dinosaurs, that they are reacting in fear, and yet do not be afraid, and do not lash out to pat the head of the Brontosaurus with meanness, for the dinosaur of this type comes to take of leaves from the trees and it is good, for the dinosaur is a peaceful herbivore. Now though he disturbeth your tree, that you are in, be not frightened, for soon he will be gone, and you will be in the land again.

Now the brontosaurus goes from tree to tree and each tree has a person in it, usually, although there are trees that have no people in them, and they are there to take leaves from the tree. Now although I have written, all physicians are dinosaurs or dragons, yet they are all brontosaurus, or herbivore dinosaurs, for a physician cannot be any type of carnivore or omnivore. Now crocodiles and alligators are sometimes soldiers of cities, and yet they can also be people brought up in a partial net that have been disturbed by those fishing. Now then there are types of dinosaurs that should be considered always with cation.

Now a rat, the lion hates, and are not most of the rats from Kursh? Now fickle-girls, are they not, who are the rats from Kursh, for envious and jealous are the traitors and they turn against their own when there is war and occupation. Now turn over your brother to torture, rat of Kursh? But is jealousy so weighty that it is worth this? But you are not a brother, and you have been a friend? Now this is written, not for the wicked, when they are doing wickedness, but it is when the righteous who are clearly doing righteousness are betrayed, and the rat has been with them in this, as guilty as they were in the righteousness.

Now there is the green forest, of green foliage, of hanging moss and vines, of tall trees, triple canopy, and shadows and floating motes in the shadows, and there is the golden forest of lying trees and standing trees, and no green is in it, but it is all golden, and there is a purple forest and it is not a forest, but it is purple and white and green emerges from it, and the green is cast onto the planet from the white, and the green is returned, and gold is come up as a square, and there is then the green square and there is the gold square coming up after. And there is the golden forest, and it hues away to white, that the traitor trees are, the Lord's traitors, for each tree is called treachory, and the treachory dwells in the white city, with white all around, and white stone, and it is a golden tree and golden leaves fall from it. Now the golden forest, it is as wood that is gold, and bark of gold dust, and paths with softer light. Now there is a river among the golden forest, with blue too blue, living waters, and does the traitor tree, treachory-tree, bring forth fruit in the city of white? Now Tel Valor, the forest of Tel Valor, is the name I give to the forest of soldiers who have returned after the war, and it is a forest of golden trees, all of them gold. Now then where is Tel Valor? But it is a city of gold. Now it is a city of white, also, and in the desert, and there is a mountain, a volcano, beyond it, and that which flies in the sky, and Tel Valor, it is a rich city of many layers, and the buildings built up in stories, and a golden city. But then where was Tel Valor, the city? But there was not a city, and it was not, but there was the forest. Now there is no blue forest, and it is blue and white and it casts green and gold on the Earth and gold is returned. 

Now Saturn is connected with Fomalhaut and Fomalhaut b.

Now what spirit is this, the spirit of the living waters, that is blue too blue? But the spirit dwells there, and from where is it? Now the spirit is floating in the Heavens, between Saturn and Earth, between Jupiter and Earth.

Now then the three rings of Fomalhaut: nature (Enoch), Christianity (Heaven and Hell), The Jewish View (Zion and Jerusalem). Now there is even the ring: psychology (limited science with belief: greek and babel). Now the ring that is Greek, it is not a secret, but only another ring, and are there not more rings? But the Greek ring was forged openly, and it belongs with the other things, for God is the Lord of all the rings, and there are likely thousands more. Now about nine rings I have offered, and the tenth I did not forge. Now by Fomalhaut I am over Saturn, and by Saturn, over Jupiter, or Jupiter is the work. For I am Fomalhaut and Saturn, and the two are both Dagon, and Lucifer.

Now every ring is also called an eye and the Eye of Morder, the tenth ring, it is Greek and Babel, and I have not written that it is bad, for I too use this ring. Now to this ring I have added nothing as far as I can tell.

Now then the clay stone is: there are losers and cheaters, and the losers who are lacking are saying the cheaters may have nothing, and the cheaters do not actually cheat at what they do. Now memorizing what others have discovered is not the same as discovering those things and two things I have taken from the tenth ring and I have added nothing to this ring. Now so, I am a cheater, and two ways, even to Babel, even to the Greeks, and the clay stone that when heated is being placed where it does not belong, it is later discovered to be a key stone and of great worth, for the clay stone that emerged from foolishness, being clay, it is seen to be a key stone, and this thing, the third thing, I also took, and from what I believed to be the world. Now then three things I took, and two from the tenth ring, and one from what I believed to be the world, and the clay stone that seemed clay, it is seen to be a key stone, for it concerns the Christ and those who are persecuted like him, and they are persecuted by fools in religion, not religious, and they are persecuted by fools in Babel, not loyal to Babel, and so are there then two Christs? But one is the Christ of Babel who is persecuted, and the other the Christ of religion who is persecuted. Now who is then the third Christ? But two things crucify, Babel and Religion, and is there that which is crucified which deserves to be crucified? Now another thing crucifies, being the clouds of Ariel, and not all crucified by them are deserving to be crucified. Now another thing crucifies, and it is the wicked workings of those in government places, the soldiers of the cities and others, and they use slander to crucify, and not all crucified are deserving. Now these four are four armies, and they are each large and one of them can crucify a person or people, if the other armies are not fighting against them. Now what is David then? But he is far removed? Now what is Solomon? But he is having little power over these things. Now these four armies are independent of all. Now there is then another army, and yet not, a Shepherd who is the Priest-King of a nation, or a leader of a meeting place, and it is depending on the circumstance. Now in America this Priest-King has much more power, comparable, almost, to another army.

Now then to the soldiers, the Lord has called you the box and you are a marble hallway, the whole of the hallway that is wood, the roof and the walls of it and the floor, and marble floor is upon the hallway, and it goeth to a room, and you are this hallway, you who are soldiers, and a golden box you are that becomes a hallway. Now the Tree of Heaven, it is the greater of the traitors who are the Lord's traitors, and it is the fur tree. Now what is on the floor of the marble hallway? But there is a pattern of gold that it is in the marble, and it is curved, a line that is curved and a beautiful pattern of it, a golden line, and it is on the marble floor, and there are different colours, light and dark, on the marble floor. Now what is this golden box? But I do not know and so I only guess that is possibly the marble floor being the body of a veteran soldier that it is the beautiful marble floor that is dark and light and has the golden lines that are curved, the beautiful pattern of it, that the body is marble. Now where this hall-way is I do not know and it goes to a room.

Now then, good as they are, for security and safety, it is not prudent that you are allowing immigrants or foreigners to a nation to be giving care to Veteran soldiers, for they should not be in that part of the building where is the marble floor and your soldiers have attacked almost every nation on Earth, and is not this thing known? But this thing is indeed known, even without knowledge of it. Now leaders must decide if they want to have soldiers or if they would like to all dwell in the wilderness as a peaceful tribe.

Now then will it be to the veteran soldier, that you maketh them the golden tree that is having the dark Earth at its feet, that is having the golden lines and the dark and pale bark, and the golden leaves, that he is the beautiful tree that has dark and pale patches and the golden lines and the dark Earth at his feet and the golden leaves, that resideth in beauty in the forest where there are shadows and he is the light that gloweth. For they go into the forest and some find him, and he is in a place where there is shadows and shade, and he is the beautiful tree that glows. Now then such is a tree that is golden, that is called The Veteran Tree.

Now then one prince I have known of, and yet I am cautious to mention who he is, for he may not desire it to be known, and may not desire to know it, and yet he has come before me, and his voice was present in my youth, even in my young youth, and he was famous among the people, especially among the fair shade, a beautiful man, pretty even, and beauty and wisdom was with him, indeed a wise prince, and he has even influence Dagon, for Dagon has come to Earth, and the wise prince was an elum, and he is alive and living and still famous among the people at the time of these books. Now then let him then know I am the angel with his foot upon the water and upon the Earth. Now the prince is not a son of Dagon, for am I a strange kidnapper, to insult? But it is religion, if one is able to understand religion, for indeed these things are disturbing to some. Now I am not the father of any, and indeed it would be insulting, that discord not be sown. Now then the prince is having a throne and a kingdom, in the fashion that is seeming most elum and zefar, for it is a kingdom of mala. Now he is involved in music, and his music has gone out to the people.

Now there has been a war in the clouds, and not the Heavens, between the Jews and the Zefar, and there should not be any war, for in the clouds there is able to be a merger of peace where both things are respected, for the Zefar will envolope the Jews, the larger cloud, the smaller cloud, and the Zefar cloud will make clean the smaller cloud, for such is the war of the clouds at this time, that a barbarian cloud came forth and began to make the land unclean. Now people watching have said, it is the Jews, the Jew's cloud is the barbarian cloud that is going forth and is unclean, but it is not the cloud of the Jews that is the barbarian cloud, but the barbarian cloud is not a cloud of the Jews, but it is a cloud of Kir and Kursh and things that are mud.

Now then quickly I send this message: let not the evil caused by the barbarian clouds of Kir and Kursh cause alarm to any, for the matter of the clouds is taken seriously. Now there are those who care much for the environment and the idea that the barbarian clouds of Kir and Kursh are Jewish clouds has been the source for distress among the people concerning the Jews, for there are many who care much about the climate, that the clouds make up the climate, and the rain that is from them is effected the climate so that the clouds are cared deeply for among the people who are not in Jerusalem. Now then renounce the barbarian clouds as well, you who are Jerusalem, for the clouds that are Jewish, are they not clean clouds to our people that the people do not resent, for they do not cause evil and bring evil? Now then there is war in the clouds, and the clouds of Kir and Kursh are effecting the environment and poisoning the soil so that disgusting things are growing up from this rain, and it is a large environmental catastrophe, although those who are apathetic and even brazen to this thing, they care not for the great environmental destruction caused by the unclean clouds of Kir and Kursh. Now the Priest-King of the Zion Temple, he has been separated also from Kir and Kursh that erupted and spread, and if he had sin only by association, his sin is removed, and he was a type of Joshua at that time who was engaged in the giving of truth and not in war, for not all can be blamed because they were there at the time of the eruption of Kir and Kursh that spread across the Earth. Now then is not the Earth still open somewhere, that clouds of Kir and Kursh continue to come up into the sky and bring unclean clouds across the sky, even to this day? Now great in a way is this people that are able to at least take the wisdom I give and then take per-cations to keep Kir and Kursh from the sky, if it pleases them due to what the people desire with their riches.

Now then, put Kir and Kursh away, and cremate it, bury it under the Earth that the water might take it, for it is an evil of this time.

Now there is Kir and Kursh, Esua, and others who have been the enemies of the angel, and they are enemies of the people.

Now will not art be from the curtain of fire around Jerusalem? But we come with more than art. Now the Lord has the beast of ten-thousand rings, for our people call them rings, and Tolkein has called them rings, and they are called eyes, for they are eyes. Now Saturn gives seven rings and Fomalhaut gives three and the three are over the seven, and all are to Jupiter, and Mars may purchase Jupiter and bring it to Earth that the clouds of Jupiter may be placed by the power of Mars as the clouds of Earth to be given to all the people of Earth. Now there may even be the clouds of such, from the clouds, that are as the clouds of Ariel that is the stories of the happenings of Zion and Jerusalem, and even the Heavens, for the people, and whether true or not, will they not be writing these things for the people? Now then, is there any need to be offended, for these things, whether true or not, are for the people, that they may learn and indulge.

Now a rude thing that is true is that nothing was ever given to them who would have a bad opinion of what was given to them, for they may place it aside and tend to their own life.

Now there is that which presents itself honestly, that men may know, and it is a honest person who does this, for they are wishing to be what they are, that they are accepted for what they are. Now there is no deceiving truth, that keeping things concealed erases what is, for he who is deceived by her cannot be loved by her, and how great the acting must be, if he is deceived, and a defeated fool comes to defend her? Now this is not my people, not the elum or zefar, but it is another people forged of mud and sand and not of fire and truth. Now wicked is this people and liking ignorance and liking to not understand the things that are taken for granted in understanding. Now what has occurred here? But she has prostituted herself to a man for money, and the man has not known of it, and the pimp has arrived, who is not paid, for he has lost money because of him, for she has committed a type of adultery against him by leaving the pimp that he should not be paid, to be stolen away by a man who did not agree to hire a prostitute. Now elum, understand this scenario easily, and instantly, that you be counted as having understanding at an excellent degree, for you, I believe, are able to do this. Now then an unsentimental people are those who fight against knowing this, and they are sand and mud, and they should keep to their own domain, which is by the Ocean where they are threshed by the Ocean.

Now then by truth, the people were divided, and the pure and wise were revealed when all that was meant for other domains was taken back to its own domain, for the sand was to return to the beach, the mud to the places of mud, the soil to the soil and fields, the rocks to the mountains, the slaves to beneath the Earth, the high things, stepping back from them, and all the things that were to be right by truth when people had the respect of society, more than this, the understanding that what is in Heaven should be on Earth.

Now then do not the Jews use their ring, and they say, we will be clean and counted wise in this thing, and keep only to our ring? Now the angel has said that this is good. Now if the using of more rings leads to Edom for any person, then do they not remember to keep themselves clean according to what is good? But if they are then not using some rings, is there any wrong for not using more rings?

Now eyes are rings, and the angel says rings rather than eyes. Now they have called lakes to be clouds, being perhaps humorous in their ways? And yet in the land of spies, and mala, these are lakes, and tor is the name of darkened tunnels where people are all anonymous and where it is very dark. Now tor is the name of the tunnels and caves and have the children of angels worked with many to make these tunnels and caves? Now there is also greatly wicked people who use these caves and the children of angels cannot keep them out for the making of caves is open to all, and none can stop any person. Now those who use these tunnels, they are some of them who call themselves Anons and they are those who when conducting themselves in many places prefer to remain anonymous. Now is it not easy to understand that none can stop these very wicked from using the tunnels and having their own caves? For there is nothing stopping anyone from entering these caves by the many openings and magic of it, that you not think the children of angels are able to enforce anything there, or stop any from using these caves.

Now many things they have been able to discern, for they are the Lord's, and they have seen a thing and said, it is something to do with Dagon, and they have seen another thing and even called it right sometimes. Now are there not wise people who understand at play, and it is not a conspiracy of any evil, but a conspiracy of the Lord who is God, that this occurs.

Now then is there even a people who have been wise, to build for themselves large shelters from rain, that the unclean clouds not effect them? Now still, the atmosphere is displeasing and there is reason, and if the atmosphere all around turns to turmoil of a storm of hell, indeed it it not a pleasing atmosphere and people are liking for it to go away. Now will not some say, appreciate finally the good climate of the clean and pure? But those most effected and bothered, they were not for wickedness. Now have not some blamed the Jews? For they have weighed it and considered, all of this comes in time from the Jews and it would not be from our people. Now in some ways, and even the angel of Bethlehem will declare it, this is true, and yet the storm turns on them as much as it turns on you, and there are the Jews who are Zion and the Jews who are Jerusalem, and so then let us then do well with this people, who are the Jews of Jerusalem. Now what is then the greater thing? But there would be no people it does not come from, the storm, if not for the people it does come from, that though the storm comes because they exist, yet if they did not exist, there will be no other things in existence, for they are the gate by which the storm comes in, for the court-yard where the storm comes to the gate, it belongs to them in this city, and without them there is not the other court-yards, and so allow it to rest, that the two things must be, the Jerusalem and the Zion, for both must be, and they bear the storm as well, and their ways are against the storm happening, that if they were able to follow their ways better there would have been no storm. Now there cannot be judgment on these levels and places. Now think the people not Jerusalem do not perceive these things? But they perceive these things much and it is a source of discord at times. Now if the storms of hell make people grateful for the good lands, yet it is still beneficial that the storms of hell should cease at some time, but I do not know all. Now the Lord's will be done, on Earth as it is in Heaven, and let us go out when we are able to perform all that will be our reward, for the will of them, others, too may change, and the Lord is able to give reward. Now then are we then not a people who desire to work for our reward, for the work too is a reward to us. Now who hates you? But is it not Esua who hates you when all the work is performed that is good? Now the stones of Esua are falling into the open pit to fill in the pit, and the soil grows over-top of it, for it goes over-top, and the pretty man is desired, for it was always so, that he should not be self-effacing in this thing, for there are some things he must do differently, and so the waters will cease, and the rocks of Esua will be covered with soil, and the grass will grow, and then even trees, and layers will be upon layers and the field will be well, with grass and with light and they will go unto the city that is by the hills of grass where there is light and will not everything be built here, at this layer and this place, when all is performed and all done and the land made right? Now then let the Zion Jews do wonderfully with this people, the Hebrew Jews, for I say it from the third Heaven, and not the realm of God, that I do not mock or mimic, but say it with the prefix of the third heaven to know that it is lower than God. Now then the prefix is isif that is written before a thing that God has said, when it is a thing lower than God, of the third Heaven, and isif diun to show respect and bow to God. For the High-Priest is isif diun god of Sion and Zion. Now it is not a thing I introduce, because it is not neccessary and not needed, except I use it for this one thing, that it is for respect and to bow to God, to say that the High-Priest is isif diun God, who has the beast, the woman with wings, with him. Now then let them not accuse concerning this thing, for it is not to be used by others, the isif diun for if you understood correctly, you would not use it, for it does not need to ever be used. Now as soon as I have used it, the isif and the diun, I remove it, that it not bother the people.

A Skirmish:

Now the voice that does not belong in the matter, it curses the truth, but integrity respects society.

Now the voice that does not belong in a matter, it curses God, that their rebellion is known, but integrity waits to do justice.

Higher are the dead than those who rebel greatly against God.

Now idle words may go everyplace, and in every matter they may meddle, for they speak among friends and enemies, but those whose feet are where they do not belong and their voice also, these are them who rebel against God.

Now by a bandit a thing is begun, and by another, a thing is continued, and more bandits in addition, and only fools may protect them.

Now Kir and Kursh are not righteousness, nor part of our people, and are they not with the soldiers of cities?

[Exit Skirmish]

Now then be prepared for the skirmish that you are able to continue, for if they are throwing some in prison in many nations, in other nations they are only taking them to be kept at a hospital and then released, or placed on what probation they can place them on, for the level of persecution is not as bad, and it is their extent of the same thing, with what they are able persecuting with. Now this is the two religious persecutions, that in some places, prison, and in other places the hospital, and one is very much worse than the other, for in prisons they have made it even as hell for a time. Now then both are religious persecution, and yet the probation is unavoidable often to give money to people, and so what is there to do? Now both must be abolished, and those who persecute are more likely to have never read the entirety of what they hate, and neither have those who are with them read the entirety, only they know they do not like something, and so it is ignorance, and foolishness, and it is even the clay stone that is not useless. Now Eretz Chadrack, though they promote their country as enlightened, the nation has much religious persecution, and it is not better in many ways than other places in the world for this, although they do not discuss it or admit to it, and yet it is so in all nations on Earth.

Now then it is so that none would oppose these things unless they were a devil-worshipper, for if they had read all of it, they would not likely oppose it, and they would have to be a devil-worshipper to oppose it, by the one eye, or ring, and a loser, by the other eye, or ring, and an animal from hell, by the other eye, or ring. Now then ninety and nine of a hundred of the Earth was cheaters, by the clay stone, and the losers were rich or poor, working or not, having credentials or not, and they were dispersed throughout the Earth, and they would have to be ignored, for they were like Damascus, and they had no shame as a group of bandits of Damascus, robbing people as unashamed bandits, who robbed in mala, who were bandits for the devil, and there was no reason or cause for what they did, only that they were bandits for the devil. Now then it was considered, they should be ignored, but they should also be fought and in some places ignored and in other places fought, and that there may be zealots who were come up from these bandits of Damascus, these unholy Damascus, and they may have to be fought by David with the battle-bow and the knife. So then it was considered, those of the right Damascus may be cleaning their own house of the wicked of their own city, Damascus, for Damascus is not evil. Now then if Damascus clears its own house of those bandits who take battle-bows, or they attempt to clean its own house of these, than it is David who is cleaning his own house, and if David has fulfilled what is right, and there are then devil-witches, than the house-cats of David have not fulfilled their part, and indeed there are no house-cats. Now then if Adonijeh is defending other types of bandits, in the fashion of them, who do not use battle-bows, for Adonijeh does not much use the battle-bow, than Adonijeh has failed. Now three things must be secure, and one is secure and two are not? But for this reason people are sometimes considering being a refugee in another nation, for no nation is the state entire, and the enemy of the state is always enemy of the partial state. Now if by actions they speak, and it is so, than by words you are telling the truth to speak of their actions in what is truthfully in the open, for lies are nothing if you are speaking of actions. Now if Adonijeh is hindered and David is wanting to clean the land of bandits, and yet there are other things also that are a problem, indeed a person may still have to become a refugee despite the want of David that people should be able to remain. Now such is religious persecution, and they may not dictate truth contrary to their actions. Now David, if he will clean the land, will Adonijeh clean the land, or Prince Rellium? But if these two, Adonijeh and Prince Rellium, will not clean the land, than there are still bandits in the land, and many.
	Now I considered, how much of the Earth is taken over by bandits, and for what reason does a small number of bandits gain control of so much, when the people are like an Ocean against a speck, or two specks of sand? Now none was more powerful than David in this thing, and none more a king and more capable except in those times when Solomon was greater, when he protested as a whole nation, and then he was much greater even than David.

Now what is found in the portion of the buildings, the hall-way, the veteran, is considered to be an enemy who is in a portion of a building where they do not belong. For the building is an official building and the person who would tread on the hallway where none may tread is caught quickly and removed, and they are assumed to be an enemy. 

Now in Tel Valor there are golden trees that are large, for they are like red-wood trees, and some are laying on the ground and some are standing, and yet they are all trees of Tel Valor, and speckled are the barks of them with gold, and there is no green in the forest, and it is like a red-wood forest.

Now then the Japanese women were the most beautiful and there such women among the fair shade, and they were exceedingly beautiful and did not the women of the fair shade desire to be this, but they were not able to because of the brutality of the cities that would not let them be as beautiful as this, and yet they had found a way, some of them, for there were brutal men in such cities and they spoke away from the eyes of others, and there were brutal things all around, and they made for the women a night-mare to dwell in, that they would be cities under siege, and the women desired to be beautiful.

Now the Kir homosexuals, who are men who desire men, they are displaying their sexual attraction through what is called sexual harassment, whereby they criticize as if what they were attracted to was ugly, as a mean woman criticizes. Now Kir stands at the right or left hand of the devil in hell.

Now then to the Prince: will they not search out the Heavens, the wise who search out the Heavens, to find truth? For there are signs all around, and it is those who do not study these things in Babel who are the people often studying most these things in the Heavens, although those who have studied in Babel, they too are studying these things and they have seen a thing a called it correctly what it is in many cases, and it is the conspiracy of God, the conspiracy of what the Lord does, and not some evil thing that occurs. Now then Prince of Saturn, one of the princes, and possibly the one who has become most famous in the angel's time, it is the bandits of Damascus and not Damascus that robs the ninety and nine of a hundred who are willing and rejoicing with truth. Now the bandits are in government, and they are spread out and dispersed in strange places and there are good people in government, and it is as half good and pure, to be traded for gold, to return as gold, as soldiers are returned as gold, and half are bandits of Damascus, soldiers who steal for the devil, for this is the only cause and reason they require, to steal good and good reward of God, blessing and truth of Mala, and the people's reward, that they might steal for the devil, and they are like soldiers in this thing. Now then it was written to the people ignore them and at times fight them, and they are bandits for because of democracy they have no right to be robbing the people.


